South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4727.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 17, Title 59 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 59-17-180. A public school shall accept cash as a form of payment for admissions at the time of the event for any interscholastic athletic activity where a fee is charged for admission. The governing body of a public school may adopt a policy allowing any cash accepted pursuant to this section to be deposited at a financial institution on the next business day. The policy must include procedures for handling the cash prior to deposit. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----